src/morphology/affixes/declinations.lexc
! VVS 20, 21
LEXICON NIMI   ! unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) suvi, lagi

+Sg+Nom:i GI ;
:e%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;                   ! suve etc
+Sg+Par:e GI ;                           ! suve, lage
+Sg+Ill:e%{S%} SG_ILL ;            ! nimme
+Sg+Ill:e%{W%} SG_ILL ;     ! nimesse 
:%+e%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                  ! lagede etc
+Pl+Par:e%+sid GI ;                      ! lagesid

! VVS 22 
LEXICON PIIM   ! unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) sepp, kaup, ...

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
:%{sg.a%} 1C ;

! VVS 22 
LEXICON KOON   ! unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) lõpp, laug

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
:%{sg.u%} 1C ;

! VVS 22 
LEXICON EIT   ! unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) kuusk, kärg

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
:%{sg.e%} 1C ;

! VVS 22 
LEXICON TAUD  ! stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp) siil, president, ...

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
:%+%{pl.e%}%{sg.i%} 1C ;  ! {pl.e} is here so it need not be in the stem lexicon

! VVS 22 
LEXICON FIAT          ! stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp) almost == TAUD, but final stop weak grade does not change 

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
:i%{WF%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;                ! Fiati etc
+Sg+Par:i GI ;                         ! Fiati
+Sg+Ill:i GI ;                         ! Fiati
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Hyp:i%{WF%}%+sse GI ;    ! Fiatisse
:%+%{pl.e%}%{sg.i%} 1C_PL ;            ! Fiatide, Fiate, Fiatisid+Use/Rare 

! VVS 22 
LEXICON KABINET                 ! stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp) almost == TAUD

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
                                      ! sg nom has a single final stop instead of double, 
                                      ! so it has to be doubled in strong grade
:%.%+%{pl.e%}%{sg.i%} 1C ;

! VVS 23 
LEXICON KAEL   ! almost = PIIM, except pl gen + 

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
:%{sg.a%} 1C_SG ;
:%{W%}%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                     ! kaelte etc 
%+Use%/Rare:%{sg.a%}%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! kaelade etc 
                                              ! pl par stem vowel (u, i, 0) is lexically determined 
                                              ! and usage-wise tagged
+Pl+Par:%{sg.a%}%+%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR ;  ! kaelu, kaelasid+Use/Rare

! VVS 23 
LEXICON POISS   ! poiss, püks; almost = TAUD, except pl gen + 

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
:i 1C_SG ;                                  ! poisi etc
:%{W%}%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                   ! poiste etc
%+Use%/Rare:%+i%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;          ! poisside etc
+Pl+Par:e GI ;                              ! poisse
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Hyp:i%+sid GI ;              ! poissisid+Use/Hyp

! VVS 24 is lexical variants under VVS 22 various subtypes

! VVS 25 
LEXICON ELANIK          ! stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp) almost == KABINET == TAUD

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;                        ! elanik
                                               ! sg nom has a single final stop instead of double, 
                                               ! so it has to be doubled in strong grade
:%.%{sg.u%} 1C_SG ;                            ! elaniku etc
:%.e%{W%}%+ N_PL_SUBPARA ;                     ! NB! elanike etc
%+Use%/Rare:%.%{sg.u%}%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;      ! elanikkude etc   
+Pl+Par:%.e GI ;                               ! elanikke
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Rare:%.%{sg.u%}%+sid GI ;        ! elanikkusid+Use/Rare

LEXICON ARMEE ! VVS 26

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;                        ! armee
: N_SG_SUBPARA ;                               ! armee etc
+Sg+Par:%+d GI ;                               ! armeed
+Sg+Ill:%{W%} SG_ILL ;                       ! armeesse, öösse; {W} is here just to get SG_ILL right
+Sg+Ill:%{S%} SG_ILL ;                       ! öhe, suhu, sohu, pähe
:%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                           ! armeede etc  
+Pl+Par:%+%{s%}id PL_PAR ;                 ! armeesid; armeid...

! ---------------
! sub-paradigms common to several inflectional types
! ---------------

! VVS 9, 10, 11, 12
LEXICON NE_S  ! VVS 9, 10, 11, 12 common forms for affix -ne, -line, -s, -tus etc 

:E1 N_SG_SUBPARA ;                
+Sg+Par:E1%+t GI ;                        ! soolast, raudset, olulist
:E1%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;        

! ------

LEXICON 2C ! consonant ending with stress on penultimate syllable, or vowel ending 

: 2C_EXCL_SG_PAR ;                        ! redeli, virsiku  
+Sg+Par:%+t GI ;                          ! redelit, virsikut

LEXICON 2C_EXCL_SG_PAR ! =2C, excluding sg partitive

:%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                       ! redelite etc
: 2C_STRONG ;                              ! redeleid, redeleil etc

LEXICON 2C_STRONG ! =2C_EXCL_SG_PAR, excluding N_PL_SUBPARA

: N_SG_SUBPARA ;                           ! redeli, kotka etc
+Sg+Ill: SG_ILL ;                ! taskusse or tasku
+Pl+Par:%+id GI ;                          ! kotkaid
%+Use%/Rare:%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! kotkail etc

LEXICON 1C ! consonant ending, stress NOT on penultimate syllable

: 1C_SG ;  ! singular forms + pl nom
: 1C_PL ;  ! plural forms

LEXICON 1C_SG ! SG subpara of 1C

:%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;                      ! koti etc
+Sg+Par: GI ;                              ! kotti
+Sg+Ill: GI ;                              ! kotti
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Hyp:%{W%}%+sse GI ;          ! kotisse

LEXICON 1C_PL ! PL subpara of 1C

:%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                       ! kottide etc
                                           ! pl par stem vowel (u, i, 0) is lexically determined 
                                           ! and usage-wise tagged
+Pl+Par:%+%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR ;       ! kingi, kingasid+Use/Rare vs. puudi+Use/Rare, puudasid

! ---------------
! most regular ...
! ---------------

LEXICON N_SG_SUBPARA     ! sg gen + sg cases depending on it + pl nom; excl sg ill

+Pl+Nom:%+d GI ;
+Sg: REGULAR_GEN_ET_AL ;

LEXICON N_PL_SUBPARA     ! pl gen + pl cases depending on it 

+Pl: STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;

LEXICON STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL  ! genitive and cases depending on it (either sg or pl)
                            ! incl. sse-illative 
+Gen: GI ; 
: STANDARD_SEM_CASES ;

LEXICON REGULAR_GEN_ET_AL  ! genitive and cases depending on it (either sg or pl)
                            ! NB! excl. illative 
+Gen: GI ; 
: REGULAR_SEM_CASES ;

LEXICON STANDARD_SEM_CASES     ! semantic cases, incl sse-illative

+Ill:%+sse GI ;
: REGULAR_SEM_CASES ;

LEXICON REGULAR_SEM_CASES     ! semantic cases, excl illative

: REGULAR_LOCATIVES ;
+Tra:%+ks GI ;
: NINATAGA ;

LEXICON NINATAGA

+Trm:%+ni GI ;	
+Ess:%+na GI ;	
+Abe:%+ta GI ;	
+Com:%+ga GI ;

	
LEXICON N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA     ! pl cases depending on vowel plural gen  
                               ! excl. ni-na-ta-ga 
+Pl: LOCATIVES ;

LEXICON LOCATIVES            

: STANDARD_LOCATIVES ;
+Tra:%+ks GI ;

LEXICON STANDARD_LOCATIVES            

+Ill:%+sse GI ;
: REGULAR_LOCATIVES ;

LEXICON REGULAR_LOCATIVES            

+Ine:%+s GI ;
+Ela:%+st GI ;
+All:%+le GI ;	
+Ade:%+l GI ;	
+Abl:%+lt GI ;	

! we want to indicate the preferred form in the stem lexicon
! (not in the continuation lexicon)

LEXICON PL_PAR                       ! for TAUD, PIIM, KOON etc types

%+Use%/Rare:%{rare%} GI ;            ! less used pl par form for that word
 GI ;                                ! default pl par form for that word

LEXICON SG_ILL                       ! for KEEL etc types

%+Use%/Rare:%+%{s%}%{s%}%{e%}%{rare%} GI ;  ! less used sg ill form for that word
:%+%{s%}%{s%}%{e%} GI ;                     ! default sg ill form for that word
